dictsource/tok_rules
// translation rules for Toki Pona
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.group a
       a          a

.group e
       e          e

.group i
       i          i

.group o
       o          o

.group u
       u          u

.group j
       j          j

.group k
       k          k

.group l
       l          l

.group m
       m          m

.group n
       n          n

.group p
       p          p

.group s
       s          s

.group t
       t          t

.group w
       w          w
